Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
CHAPTER 2 Military Affairs

Cross references.

North Georgia College Military Scholarships and North Georgia College Reserve Officers’ Training Corps Grant Program, §§

20-3-420

et seq. and

20-3-430

et seq.

Grants to children of Georgia National Guard members, T. 20, C. 3, A. 7, P. 3, S. 10.

Powers of board of trustees of Georgia Military College, §

20-3-546

.

Absentee voting generally, §

21-2-380

et seq.

Constituting of commissioned officers of armed services of United States as ex officio notaries public of state, § 45-17-30.